Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
353C

PUBLIC
SAFETY

Section

353C-1 Definitions

353C-2 Director of public safety; powers and
duties

353C-3 Deputy directors; appointment

353C-4 Appointment of employees with police
powers and other

employees

353C-4.5 Correctional health care program

353C-5 Criminal history record checks

353C-6 Parking fees, exemption

353C-7 Federal reimbursement maximization special
fund

353C-8 Sexual assaults in prison

353C‑9 Department accreditation required

353C-10 Service of process; list

Note

Certain positions in the department are exempt from the civil
service requirements of chapter 76, for three calendar years commencing on July
1, 2016, unless extended by legislative act. L 2016, c 79, §3.

Incarcerated parents; forms or questions to ask offenders
upon intake; plan for management of data collected and public disclosure of
data. L 2015, c 16, §3.

Reentry pilot project for nonviolent, low-risk drug
offenders; reports to 2015-2016 legislature (repealed June 30, 2016). L 2014,
c 149; L 2015, c 126, §26.

State law enforcement memorial. L 2011, c 14.

Cross References

Controlled substances and narcotics enforcement, see chapter
329.

Forensic identification, see chapter 844D.

Medical use of marijuana, see §§329-121 to 329-128.

Sex offender treatment program, see chapter 353E.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next